Utah statutes.
72-11-214.    Passenger ropeways -- Not common carriers or public utilities -- Cooperative agreement with United States Forest Service.

(1)  Passenger ropeways are not common carriers or public utilities.

(2)  To avoid duplicate effort by authorities having jurisdiction over passenger ropeways on National Forest System land in the state, the committee may enter into a cooperative agreement with the United States Forest Service to establish reasonable standards for design, construction, maintenance, operational practices, and inspection.

(3)  Upon application for registration of a passenger tramway, the operator shall pay to the committee a reasonable inspector's fee, plus a surcharge, that would have been charged had the inspection been made by the committee and its inspectors.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 195, 1999 General Session

